Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Criminal and Civil History.

Cross references. —

Section 53
ch. 57, SLA 2005, directs that the provisions of
AS

47.05.300

—

47.05.390

apply to (1) applications or requests submitted within the 30 days before, or submitted on or after, the effective date of
AS

47.05.300

—

47.05.390

for initial licensure, certification, or other approval or selection; and (2) applications or requests submitted within the 30 days before, or submitted on or after, the effective date of
AS 47.05.300 —
47.05.390 for renewal of a license, certification, or other approval or selection for an entity or individual service provider that is subject to those sections.
It further provides that the Department of Health and Social Services may not make a final determination regarding an application or request described in sec. 53 (a) earlier than the effective date of
AS 47.05.300 —
47.05.390.

For transitional provisions regarding applications for licenses or approvals under the chapter that were submitted more than 30 days before the effective date of AS

47.05.300

—

47.05.390

, see § 57, ch. 57, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to AS

47.05.300

-

47.05.390

, see sec. 26, ch. 69, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 47.05.300.
Applicability.

The provisions of AS

47.05.310

—

47.05.390

apply to any individual or entity that is required by statute or regulation to be licensed or certified by the department or that is eligible to receive payments, in whole or in part, from the department to provide for the health, safety, and welfare of persons who are served by the programs administered by the department.

Those individual service providers subject to AS

47.05.310

—

47.05.390

under (a) of this section include

public home care providers described in AS

47.05.017

;

providers of home and community-based waiver services financed under AS

47.07.030(c)

; and

case managers to coordinate community mental health services under AS

47.30.530

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to AS

47.05.300

—

47.05.390

, see sec. 26, ch. 69, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For purpose, applicability, and administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 10, art. 1.

For barrier crimes, criminal history checks, and centralized registry, see 7 AAC 10, art. 3.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For home health agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 11.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 1.

For provisions for providers, see 7 AAC 41, art. 2.

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For consumer-directed and agency-based personal care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 19.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

For operation of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 69, SLA 2018 (SB 81), which was the basis for changes to AS

47.05.300

-

47.05.390

, see 2017 Senate Journal 452 — 454.

Sec. 47.05.310.
Criminal history; criminal history check; compliance.

If an individual has been charged with, convicted of, found not guilty by reason of insanity for, or adjudicated as a delinquent for, a crime that is inconsistent with the standards for licensure or certification established by the department by regulation, that individual may not own an entity, or be an officer, director, partner, member, or principal of the business organization that owns an entity. In addition, an entity may not

allow that individual to operate the entity;

hire or retain that individual at the entity as an employee, independent contractor, or unsupervised volunteer of the entity;

allow that individual to reside in the entity if not a recipient of services; or

allow that individual to be present in the entity if the individual would have regular contact with individuals who receive services from the entity, unless that individual is a family member of or visitor of an individual who receives services from the entity.

The department may not issue or renew a license or a certification for an entity or an individual that is in violation of (a) of this section or that would be in violation based on the information received as part of the application process.

[Repealed, § 25 ch 69 SLA 2018.]

An entity or an individual shall provide to the department a release of information authorization for a criminal history check under this section for each individual who is not a recipient of services from the entity, who is not in the custody of the department, and, after the entity applies for or has been issued a license, license renewal, certification, or certification renewal by the department,

who intends to become an owner of the entity, or an officer, director, partner, member, or principal of the business organization that owns the entity;

whom the entity intends to hire or retain as the operator of the entity’s business;

whom the entity intends to hire or retain as an employee, independent contractor, or unsupervised volunteer of the entity; or

who will be present in the entity or at the places of operation of the entity, and would have regular contact with individuals who receive services from the entity, but who is not a family member or visitor of an individual who receives services from the entity.

An individual for whom a release of information authorization has been provided to the department shall submit the individual’s fingerprints to the department, with the fee established under AS

12.62.160

, for a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and for submission by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The Department of Public Safety shall provide the report of criminal justice information and the results of the national criminal history record check to the department for its use in considering an application for a license, license renewal, certification, or certification renewal, or in considering other approval or selection regarding an entity or individual, for compliance with the standards established in this section. The department may waive the requirement for fingerprint submission if an individual is unable to provide fingerprints due to a medical or physical condition that is documented by a licensed physician.

The provisions of this section do not apply if the department grants an exception from a requirement of (a) — (e) of this section under a regulation adopted by the department or if the department grants a variance under AS

47.05.360

.

The department shall adopt regulations listing those criminal offenses that are inconsistent with the standards for licensure or certification by the department.

For purposes of this section, in place of nonissuance or nonrenewal of a license or certification, an entity or individual that is not required to be licensed or certified by the department or a person wishing to become an entity or individual that is not required to be licensed or certified by the department is ineligible to receive a payment, in whole or in part, from the department to provide for the health, safety, and welfare of persons who are served by the programs administered by the department if the entity or individual is in violation of this section or would be in violation of this section based on information received by the department as part of an application, approval, or selection process.

[Repealed, § 25 ch 69 SLA 2018.]

An individual who possesses a valid teacher certificate issued under AS

14.20.015

—

14.20.025

and applies to work at a facility licensed or certified by the Department of Education and Early Development or who applies to work in a child care facility or residential child care facility in a position as a certificated teacher with supervised access may request that the individual’s criminal justice information and national criminal history record check on file with the Department of Education and Early Development be used to satisfy the requirements of (d) and (e) of this section.

A person is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune from civil or criminal liability if the person

makes a report of medical assistance fraud, abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

submits information to a civil history database identified under AS

47.05.330

; or

fails to hire or retain an employee or unsupervised volunteer because the employee or unsupervised volunteer is included in a civil history database identified under AS

47.05.330

.

The department may issue or renew a foster home license under AS 47.32 or provide payments under AS

47.14.100(b)

or (d) to an entity, individual service provider, or person if the applicant or a person who resides in the home is barred from licensure or payment under (c), (i)(2), or (i)(3) of this section and

a person in the home is an adult family member or family friend of a child in the custody or supervision of the state under AS 47.10;

the department finds that placing the child with the entity, individual service provider, or person is in the best interests of the child; and

the conduct that is the basis of the finding under (c), (i)(2), or (i)(3) of this section occurred at least 10 years before the date the department receives the application for licensure or renewal or makes a payment to the entity, individual service provider, or person.

In this section,

“adult family member” has the meaning given in AS

47.10.990

;

“child care facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.25.095

;

“foster home” has the meaning given in AS

47.32.900

;

“residential child care facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.32.900

;

“supervised access” means that a supervisor maintains a prudent level of awareness of the whereabouts of the individual for whom supervised access is required to ensure the protection of recipients of services.

History.

(§ 19 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 19 ch 2 SSSLA 2015; am § 4 — 7 ch 15 SLA 2018; am §§ 4 — 9, 25 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (k) was enacted as (

l

); relettered in 2018, at which time (k) was relettered as (m). Paragraphs (m)(1) and (3) were enacted as (4) and (5); renumbered in 2018, at which time other paragraphs were renumbered to maintain alphabetical consistency.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 22(b), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative code. —

For purpose, applicability, and administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 10, art. 1.

For barrier crimes, criminal history checks, and centralized registry, see 7 AAC 10, art. 3.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For home health agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 11.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 1.

For provisions for providers, see 7 AAC 41, art. 2.

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

For consumer-directed and agency-based personal care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 19.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

For operation of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective October 7, 2015, added (j) and (k) [now (m)].

The first 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, added (k)(4) and (5) [now (m)(1) and (3)]; added (

l

).

The second 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, repealed (c); in the introductory language in (d), inserted “or an individual” following “An entity”, substituted “check under this section for each individual” for “check for an individual”, inserted “, who is not in the custody of the department” following “after the entity” and inserted “applies for or” preceding “has been issued”, made a stylistic change in (d)(4); in (e), inserted “or individual” following “regarding an entity” near the end of the second sentence, deleted the former third sentence, which read, “For purposes of obtaining access to criminal justice information maintained by the Department of Public Safety under AS 12.62, the department is a criminal justice agency conducting a criminal justice activity.”; in (f), added “or if the department grants a variance under AS

47.05.360

” at the end; rewrote (h); repealed (i); added (

l

) [now (k)].

Editor's notes. —

Under secs. 4 and 5, ch. 15, SLA 2018, effective September 5, 2018, former subsections (c) and (i) were amended.
Under sec. 25, ch. 69, SLA 2018, effective September 25, 2018, former subsections (c) and (i) were repealed.
The repeals were given effect.

Sec. 47.05.320.
Criminal history use standards.

The department shall by regulation establish standards for the consideration and use by the department, an entity, or an individual service provider of the criminal history of an individual obtained under AS

47.05.310

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For barrier crimes, criminal history checks, and centralized registry, see 7 AAC 10, art. 3.

For home health agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 11.

For provisions for providers, see 7 AAC 41, art. 2.

For consumer-directed and agency-based personal care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 19.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

For operation of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 2.

Sec. 47.05.325.
Civil history; civil history check; compliance.

The department shall establish by regulation civil history standards for denial of issuance or renewal of a license or certification for an individual or for an entity if the individual who is applying for a license, license renewal, certification, or certification renewal is

a biological or adoptive parent, guardian, custodian, or Indian custodian of a child who is or was the subject of a child-in-need-of-aid petition under AS 47.10 and the individual had custody of the child at the time the child was the subject of a petition; or

the subject of a finding or circumstance described in AS

47.05.330(a)

.

If an individual is the subject of a petition or finding or circumstance described in (a) of this section, or a substantially similar provision in another jurisdiction, the individual may not own an entity or be an officer, director, partner, member, employee, or principal of the business organization that owns an entity. In addition, an entity may not

allow that individual to operate the entity;

hire or retain that individual at the entity as an employee, independent contractor, or unsupervised volunteer of the entity;

allow that individual to reside in the entity, unless that individual receives services from the entity or is in the custody of the state; or

allow that individual to be present in the entity if the individual would have regular contact with individuals who receive services from the entity, unless that individual is a family member of or visitor of an individual who receives services from the entity.

An entity or an individual shall provide to the department a release of information authorization for a civil history check under this section for each individual who is not a recipient of services from the entity, who is not in the custody of the department, and, after the entity applies for or has been issued a license, license renewal, certification, or certification renewal by the department,

who intends to become an owner of the entity, or an officer, director, partner, member, or principal of the business organization that owns the entity;

whom the entity intends to hire or retain as the operator of the entity’s business;

whom the entity intends to hire or retain as an employee, independent contractor, or unsupervised volunteer of the entity; or

who will be present in the entity or at the places of operation of the entity, and would have regular contact with individuals who receive services from the entity, but who is not a family member of or visitor of an individual who receives services from the entity.

For purposes of this section, in place of nonissuance or nonrenewal of a license or certification, an entity or individual that is not required to be licensed or certified by the department or a person wishing to become an entity or individual that is not required to be licensed or certified by the department is instead ineligible to receive a payment, in whole or in part, from the department to provide for the health, safety, and welfare of persons who are served by the programs administered by the department if the entity or individual is in violation of this section or would be in violation of this section based on information received by the department as part of an application, approval, or selection process.

The department shall by regulation identify other governmental agencies or political subdivisions of the state that can request information that is required under this section for a similar purpose.

The provisions of this section do not apply if the department grants an exception from the requirements of (a) or (b) of this section under a regulation adopted by the department or if the department grants a variance under AS

47.05.360

.

A person is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune from civil and criminal liability if the person

makes a report of medical assistance fraud, abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

submits information to a civil history database identified under AS

47.05.330

; or

fails to hire or retain an employee or unsupervised volunteer because the employee or unsupervised volunteer is included in a civil history database identified under AS

47.05.330

.

The department shall by regulation establish standards for the consideration and use by the department, an entity, or an individual of the civil history of an individual obtained under this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 28,
ch. 69, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 25, 2018, in accordance with
AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 47.05.330.
Identification of civil history databases for a civil history check; confidentiality.

The department shall by regulation identify each database the department will review when conducting a civil history check under AS

47.05.325

to identify each individual

whom a court or the department has found

to have committed abuse, neglect, undue influence, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult;

under AS 47.32 or regulations adopted under AS 47.32, to have significantly adversely affected the health, safety, or welfare of an individual who is receiving a service from an entity licensed under AS 47.32; a finding described in this subparagraph includes a decision to revoke, suspend, or deny a license or license renewal, or the relinquishment of a license as part of a settlement agreement;

who has been subject to criminal or civil penalties for a violation of AS 09.58, AS 47.05, AS 47.07, AS 47.08, or regulations adopted under AS 09.58, AS 47.05, AS 47.07, or AS 47.08;

about whom the department or a court has made a substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect under AS 47.10 or AS 47.14;

who was a biological or adoptive parent, guardian, custodian, or Indian custodian of a child at the time the child was the subject of a child-in-need-of- aid petition under AS 47.10;

who, in the course of employment with the state, has been terminated from employment or has had an allegation of assaultive, abusive, neglectful, or exploitive behavior or actions substantiated;

who, in this state or another jurisdiction, for reasons related to abuse, neglect, undue influence, exploitation, or other reasons that are inconsistent with standards for the protection of public health, safety, or welfare, has had a professional license, certification, or similar professional designation revoked, suspended, or denied, or has had a request for renewal of a professional license, certification, or similar professional designation denied;

whom another state or jurisdiction has identified on a civil registry or database substantially similar to the databases identified under this section for reasons substantially similar to the reasons identified in (1) — (6) of this subsection.

The information gathered under this section is not a public record under AS

40.25.110

and is not subject to public inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

. However, information gathered under this section may be released to an entity, an individual who is included in a database, a governmental agency, and a political subdivision of the state in a manner provided under this section and regulations adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 19 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 11 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For purpose, applicability, and administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 10, art. 1.

For barrier crimes, criminal history checks, and centralized registry, see 7 AAC 10, art. 3.

For home health agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 11.

For provisions for providers, see 7 AAC 41, art. 2.

For consumer-directed and agency-based personal care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 19.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

For operation of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 2.

For variances, see 7 AAC 75, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, rewrote the section.

Sec. 47.05.340.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement AS

47.05.300

—

47.05.390

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For barrier crimes, criminal history checks, and centralized registry, see 7 AAC 10, art. 3.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For home health agencies, see 7 AAC 12, art. 11.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 1.

For provisions for providers, see 7 AAC 41, art. 2.

For consumer-directed and agency-based personal care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 19.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 50, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 50, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 56, art. 1.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 56, art. 3.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

For personnel, see 7 AAC 57, art. 3.

For operation of assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75, art. 2.

For variances, see 7 AAC 75, art. 3.

Sec. 47.05.350.
Use of information; immunity.

An entity that obtains information about an employee under a criminal history check under AS

47.05.310

or a civil history check under AS

47.05.325

may use that information only as provided for in regulations adopted by the department under this chapter. However, if an entity reasonably relies on the information provided under the regulations adopted by the department to deny employment to an individual who was selected for hire as an employee, including during a period of provisional employment, the entity is not liable in an action brought by the individual based on the employment determination resulting from the information.

History.

(§ 19 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 12 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, in the first sentence, deleted “or individual service provider” following “An entity”, inserted “or a civil history check under AS

47.05.325

” following “history check under AS

47.05.310

”, and substituted “this chapter” for “AS

47.05.320

” at the end, in the second sentence, twice deleted “or individual service provider” following “entity”.

Sec. 47.05.360.
Variance request; final decision.

An individual or entity subject to the provisions of AS

47.05.310

or

47.05.325

may request a variance from the provisions of AS

47.05.310

or

47.05.325

under procedures established by the department by regulation. The procedures must include the establishment of a variance committee to consider requests for variances. A request for a variance may include a request that the department issue a written explanation of incorrect information contained in the civil history databases identified under AS

47.05.330

.

An individual or entity that is dissatisfied with a decision by a variance committee may, not more than 30 days after the committee issues the decision, apply to the commissioner for reconsideration of the decision. A determination by the commissioner is a final agency decision for purposes of appeal to the superior court.

The department shall disclose information and records pertaining to a child subject to AS 47.10 or AS 47.17 to a variance committee as provided under AS

47.10.093(b)

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 28,
ch. 69, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 25, 2018, in accordance with
AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 47.05.390.
Definitions.

In AS

47.05.300

—

47.05.390

, unless the context otherwise requires,

[Repealed, § 25 ch 69 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 25 ch 69 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 25 ch 69 SLA 2018.]

“criminal justice information” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“entity” means an entity listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

or an individual service provider as described in AS

47.05.300

and includes an owner, officer, director, member, or partner of the entity;

“individual service provider” means an individual described in AS

47.05.300(a)

, and includes those listed in AS

47.05.300(b)

;

“license” includes a provisional license;

“unsupervised” means that an individual who is licensed under AS 47.32, after submitting a criminal history background check, is not physically present to observe the volunteer at the entity.

History.

(§ 19 ch 57 SLA 2005; am §§ 14, 25 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, repealed (1) – (3), in (6), inserted “or an individual service provider as described in AS

47.05.300

” following “listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

”.